New York, session 2025-2026, S7944.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 954 of the labor law, as 2 added by section 1 of subpart O of part XX of chapter 55 of the laws of 3 2020, are amended and a new subdivision 7 is added to read as follows: 4 4. Alternative qualifications. Applicants for an elevator mechanic's 5 license or accessibility lift technician's license who do not possess 6 the industry certifications identified above may demonstrate their qual- 7 ifications and abilities, training, and continuing education by provid- 8 ing acceptable proof of: 9 (a) a certificate of successful completion and successfully passing 10 the mechanic examination of a nationally recognized training program for 11 the elevator industry including, but not limited to, the national eleva- 12 tor industry educational program or its equivalent, supplemented with 13 continuing education as may be required by this section; or 14 (b) a certificate of successful completion of the state registered 15 apprenticeship programs for the apprenticeable trades of Elevator Servi- 16 cer Repairer, including the joint apprentice and training committee of 17 the elevator industry of local 3, IBEW, EE division training program, or 18 equivalent registered apprenticeship program for elevator mechanics, 19 having standards substantially equivalent to those programs and regis- 20 tered with the bureau of apprenticeship and training, U.S. department EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11118-03-5 S. 7944--A 2 1 of labor or a state apprenticeship council, supplemented with continuing 2 education as may be required by this section; or 3 (c) [work on elevator construction, maintenance or repair with direct 4 and immediate supervision in this state for a period of not less than 5 four years immediately prior to the effective date of this article 6 supplemented with continuing education and testing as may be required by 7 this section; or 8 (d)] successful completion of an examination established by the New 9 York state civil service commission or a municipal civil service commis- 10 sion having jurisdiction as defined by subdivision four of section two 11 of the civil service law, subsequent appointment to a position related 12 to work on elevator construction, maintenance, mechanics, inspection, or 13 repair as may be properly classified by the commissioner of civil 14 service or a municipal civil service commission having jurisdiction, and 15 work on elevator construction, maintenance, mechanics, inspection, or 16 repair, with direct and immediate supervision in this state for a period 17 of not less than four years immediately prior to the effective date of 18 this article supplemented with continuing education as may be required 19 by this section[.]; or 20 (d) in the event an elevator contractor encounters a verifiable short- 21 age of licensed mechanics, an elevator contractor may request that the 22 department issue a temporary elevator mechanic license to an elevator 23 apprentice who can provide documentation demonstrating that such appren- 24 tice is currently enrolled in an elevator apprenticeship program and has 25 a minimum of four thousand hours of elevator industry experience. A 26 verifiable shortage can be declared by a majority vote of the board, and 27 may be extended at each subsequent meeting of the board. Each temporary 28 elevator mechanic license shall be valid for forty-five days so long as 29 such temporary elevator mechanic is employed by the licensed elevator 30 contractor that requested the temporary elevator mechanic license and 31 shall be renewable so long as the shortage of license holders exists. 32 Fees shall be determined by the board. 33 5. Continuing education. The renewal of all licenses granted under the 34 provisions of subdivision four of this section shall be conditioned upon 35 acceptable proof of completion of a course designed to ensure the 36 continuing education of licensees on new and existing national, state, 37 and local conveyances codes and standards and on technology and techni- 38 cal education and workplace safety, provided the applicant was notified 39 of the availability of such courses when the license was previously 40 granted or renewed. Such course shall consist of not less than eight 41 contact hours (.8 CEU) annually and completed preceding any such license 42 renewal. The [commissioner] board shall establish requirements for 43 continuing education and training programs, and shall approve such 44 programs and providers, as well as maintain a list of approved programs 45 which shall be made available to license applicants, permit applicants, 46 renewal applicants and other interested parties upon request. The 47 [commissioner] board may promulgate rules and regulations setting forth 48 the criteria for approval of such programs, the procedures to be 49 followed in applying for such approval, and other rules and regulations 50 as the commissioner deems necessary and proper to effectuate the 51 purposes of this section. 52 7. Special provisions. No person shall erect, construct, alter, 53 replace, maintain, remove, or dismantle any conveyance, or wire any 54 conveyance from the mainline feeder terminals on the controller in 55 existing buildings or structures in the jurisdiction of this state 56 unless such person is a licensed elevator mechanic working under the S. 7944--A 3 1 direct supervision of a licensed elevator contractor. A licensed eleva- 2 tor contractor is not required for removing or dismantling conveyances, 3 which are destroyed as a result of a complete demolition of an existing 4 building or structure. 5 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 955 of the labor law, 6 as added by section 1 of subpart O of part XX of chapter 55 of the laws 7 of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 8 (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, if the 9 commissioner finds, after notice and hearing, that an individual has 10 violated any provision of this article, [he or she] such commissioner 11 may impose a civil penalty not to exceed [one] ten thousand dollars for 12 each such violation. In cases where a contractor employed or relied on 13 unlicensed mechanics, the commissioner shall impose civil penalties on 14 the contractor or other party responsible for each person found to be 15 working without a license by such contractor or party. Upon a second or 16 subsequent violation within three years of the determination of a prior 17 violation, the commissioner may impose a civil penalty not to exceed 18 [two] twenty thousand dollars per violation. 19 § 3. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 958 to read as 20 follows: 21 § 958. Inspection of elevators and conveyances. Except in a city with 22 a population of one million or more, it shall be the responsibility of 23 the owner of all elevators and other conveyances subject to this article 24 to ensure that such equipment conforms to the following inspection and 25 testing requirements: 26 1. New or altered conveyances shall be inspected and tested in accord- 27 ance with the American Society of Mechanical Engineers safety code for 28 elevators and escalators version A17.1/CSA B-44, section 8.10. 29 2. Existing conveyances shall be inspected and tested in accordance 30 with the American Society of Mechanical Engineers safety code for eleva- 31 tors and escalators version A17.1/CSA B-44, section 8.11. 32 3. Inspections and tests of conveyances required under this section 33 shall be conducted to ensure the conveyances are operated and maintained 34 in accordance with applicable code requirements for such conveyances as 35 adopted or determined by the department. 36 4. It shall be the responsibility of the owner of all conveyances to 37 ensure that the inspections and tests required pursuant to this section 38 are performed in compliance with the applicable code requirements for 39 such conveyances as adopted or determined by the department. 40 5. All work required for inspections and the associated tests of 41 elevators and other conveyances shall be performed by a licensed eleva- 42 tor mechanic and shall be physically witnessed by a licensed elevator 43 inspector to ensure compliance with applicable code requirements for 44 such conveyances as adopted or determined by the department. 45 6. All inspections of elevators and other conveyances shall be 46 performed by a licensed elevator inspector to ensure compliance with 47 applicable code requirements for such conveyances as adopted or deter- 48 mined by the department. 49 7. When any tests on elevators or other conveyances are performed 50 pursuant to this section and such tests are required to be witnessed by 51 a licensed elevator inspector in accordance with this section or appli- 52 cable industry codes or standards incorporated herein, such inspections 53 shall be conducted by a licensed elevator inspector who is employed by 54 the state and who shall be physically present during the tests to 55 witness such tests to ensure they are properly administered and to veri- 56 fy test results. S. 7944--A 4 1 8. Subsequent to any inspection, the licensed elevator inspector shall 2 supply the property owner and the department with a written inspection 3 report verifying code compliance or describing any code violations 4 found. It shall be the responsibility of the department to verify 5 compliance with the requirements of this chapter and applicable code 6 requirements, as adopted or required by the department. 7 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.